Illinois, session 104th, SB2333.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Livestock Management Facilities Act is 5amended by adding Section 65 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 77/65 new)7    Sec. 65. Expansion by 500 or more animal units. The 8Department may not approve a livestock management facility or 9a livestock waste handling facility to expand its capacity to 10serve 500 or more additional animal units unless the livestock 11management facility or livestock waste handling facility has a 12report from the Illinois State Water Survey verifying an 13adequate water supply for the livestock and the surrounding 14neighbors within 1.5 miles.